test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k6_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    úlvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: úlvur
    úlvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: úlv
    úlvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: úlvi
    úlvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: úlvs
    úlvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: úlvar
    úlvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: úlvar
    úlvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: úlvum
    úlvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: úlva
    úlvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: úlvurin
    úlvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: úlvin
    úlvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: úlvinum
    úlvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: úlvsins
    úlvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: úlvarnir
    úlvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: úlvarnar
    úlvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: úlvunum
    úlvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: úlvanna
